Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Operation, Management and Personnel
§ 47-5-28.
Additional powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall have the following powers and duties:

To implement and administer laws and policy relating to corrections and coordinate the efforts of the department with those of the federal government and other state departments and agencies, county governments, municipal governments, and private agencies concerned with providing offender services;

To establish standards, in cooperation with other state agencies having responsibility as provided by law, provide technical assistance, and exercise the requisite supervision as it relates to correctional programs over all state-supported adult correctional facilities and community-based programs;

To promulgate and publish such rules, regulations and policies of the department as are needed for the efficient government and maintenance of all facilities and programs in accord insofar as possible with currently accepted standards of adult offender care and treatment;

To provide the Parole Board with suitable and sufficient office space and support resources and staff necessary to conducting Parole Board business under the guidance of the Chairman of the Parole Board;

To contract for transitional reentry center beds that will be used as noncorrections housing for offenders released from the department on parole, probation or post-release supervision but do not have appropriate housing available upon release. At least one hundred (100) transitional reentry center beds contracted by the department and chosen by the Parole Board shall be available for the Parole Board to place parolees without appropriate housing;

To make an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature reflecting the activities of the department and make recommendations for improvement of the services to be performed by the department;

To cooperate fully with periodic independent internal investigations of the department and to file the report with the Governor and the Legislature;

To make personnel actions for a period of one (1) year beginning July 1, 2016, that are exempt from State Personnel Board rules, regulations and procedures in order to give the commissioner flexibility in making an orderly, effective and timely reorganization and realignment of the department; and

To perform such other duties necessary to effectively and efficiently carry out the purposes of the department as may be directed by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 15; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 18; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 18; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 18; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 9; Laws, 1989, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 3, § 10; Laws, 1995, ch. 416, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 49; Laws, 2016, ch. 495, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 47-5-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 13; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 4; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 5]

§ 47-5-30.
Commissioner of Corrections; development of five-year strategic plan for operation of state correctional system.

The Commissioner of Corrections shall develop a strategic plan for its operation of the state correctional system. The strategic plan shall cover a five-year period. The plan shall include, at a minimum, the following:

A clearly defined comprehensive statement of the mission, goals and objectives of the agency;

Performance effectiveness objectives for each facility under the jurisdiction of the department;

A description of the department’s internal management system used to evaluate its performance in relation to projected levels;

Detailed plans and strategies for meeting current and future needs and achieving goals and objectives established for the state correctional system;

A detailed analysis of the use of current agency resources in meeting current needs and expected future needs, and additional resources that may be necessary to meet future needs;

An analysis of factors affecting projected prison populations including impact of juveniles on prison populations and how populations are expected to change within the period of the plan;

A plan to remove inmates from county jails.

The department shall revise the plan annually.

Upon completion of the initial plan and each revision, the department shall provide copies to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Chairman of the Senate Corrections Committee, the Chairman of the House Penitentiary Committee, the Legislative Budget Office, the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Committee, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration and the Legislative Reference Bureau.

The commissioner shall develop the strategic plan before September 23, 1994.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 27; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009.).

§ 47-5-31.
Reports by commissioner; inventory.

The commissioner shall monthly make to the Governor and to the State Fiscal Management Board and to the Chairmen of the Corrections Committee of the Senate and Penitentiary Committee of the House of Representatives full and complete reports of the fiscal affairs of such correctional system and of the general conditions with relation thereto. Not more than thirty (30) days after the end of each fiscal year said commissioner shall give a full and complete inventory of all property of every description belonging to the correctional system, and there shall be set opposite each item the book value of same. Such inventory shall further include a statement of the fiscal affairs of such system as of the last day of the fiscal year; and a sufficient number of copies of such inventory and report shall be printed to give general publicity thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7931; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 11; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 6; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 23; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 19; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 388; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 19; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 19; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-33.
Commissioner authorized to administer oaths, and to summon and examine witnesses.

The commissioner, in the discharge of his duties, is authorized to administer oaths, to summon and examine witnesses, and take such other steps as may be necessary to ascertain the truth of any matter about which he may have the right to inquire.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7941; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 21; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 24; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 20; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 20; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 20; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-35.
Auditor for correctional system.

The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) shall appoint an auditor to audit the correctional system, and provide sufficient office facilities in the Jackson office, who shall be a certified public accountant or an experienced accountant, whose duty shall be to audit all accounts of the state correctional system for the purpose of reporting to the Legislative Budget Office. He shall report whether supplies and products bought and sold are handled in accordance with law and when bought on samples and specifications whether they measure up to such samples and specifications when the goods are received. The auditor shall report on the letting of bids and shall make a determination that all bids are advertised and let in accordance with law and shall render a report on same. The auditor shall be responsible to make a periodic inventory on all goods, machinery, livestock, farm produce or any other property of the correctional system and make a report thereon to the Legislative Budget Office on such terms and conditions and as often as required by the committee. The salaries and expenses of such auditor or his employees shall be paid from funds appropriated for support of the Legislature or its committees.

Such auditor shall make, at least, a monthly report to the Legislative Budget Office and the Chairman of the Corrections Committee of the Senate and the Chairman of the Penitentiary Committee in the House of Representatives.

The auditor shall attend all the meetings of the board and shall be notified by the board of all meetings or specially called meetings. The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall provide the auditor with a secretary and such personnel as it deems necessary.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7952; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 32; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 7; Laws, 1974, ch. 539 § 7; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 25; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 21; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 21; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 219; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-37.
Fiscal comptroller, bookkeepers, and assistants; maintenance of modern accounting system; commissioner to sign warrants.

The commissioner shall employ a qualified fiscal comptroller who shall be a certified public accountant and who shall be charged with the responsibility of maintaining a modern accounting system which shall accurately reflect all fiscal transactions in such manner and in such form as shall be recommended by the State Fiscal Management Board. The commissioner shall employ such qualified bookkeepers and other clerical personnel as required to maintain the accounting system who shall devote their full time to their duties as employees of the correctional system. The fiscal comptroller shall make a monthly report to the Governor and Chairmen of Corrections Committee of the Senate and the Penitentiary Committee of the House of Representatives. The fiscal comptroller shall countersign all checks. The fiscal comptroller shall have sole responsibility for all purchases and the signing of all purchase orders issued by the correctional system. Such fiscal comptroller shall execute a good and sufficient bond payable to the State of Mississippi in the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), conditioned for the satisfactory performance of the duties of his office, and the accurate accounting of any moneys and properties coming into his hands.

The commissioner or his designee shall sign all requisitions for issuance of warrant authorizing any disbursement of any sum or sums on account of the correctional system, and no money shall be paid out on any account of the correctional system except on a requisition for issuance of warrant signed by him or his designee.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7934; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 14; Laws, 1966, ch. 378, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 5; Laws, 1974, ch. 539 § 8; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 26; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 22; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 22; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 22; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-39.
Fiscal impact notes.

As used in this section, “fiscal note” means the estimated dollar cost to the state for the first year and the annual cost thereafter. The term “ten-year fiscal note” means the estimated dollar cost to the state over the ten-year period following passage or adoption of the subject of the fiscal note.

Whenever legislation is introduced in the Legislature, which would establish a new criminal offense or would amend the sentencing provisions of an existing criminal offense, the Department of Corrections shall provide a fiscal note and a ten-year fiscal note on the proposed legislation upon the request of any member of the Legislature. The fiscal note shall be published in electronic form on the Mississippi Legislature website as provided in Section 5-1-85.

State agencies and political subdivisions shall cooperate with the department in preparing fiscal notes and the ten-year fiscal notes. Such agencies and political subdivisions shall submit requested information to the department in a timely fashion.

In preparing fiscal notes and the ten-year fiscal notes, the department must accurately report to the Legislature information provided to the department by state agencies and political subdivisions.

The department may request information from nongovernmental agencies and organizations to assist in preparing the fiscal note and the ten-year fiscal note.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 64, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 47-5-41.
Employees’ oath of office.

All employees, before entering upon their duties, shall take and subscribe the following oath to be filed and preserved by the commissioner:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will faithfully and diligently perform all the duties required of me as_______________of the correctional system, and will observe and execute the laws, rules and regulations passed and prescribed for the government thereof so far as the same concerns or pertains to any employment, and that I will not ill-treat or abuse any offender under my care contrary to the law and the rules and regulations prescribed by legal authority. So help me God.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7962; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 42; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 30; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 10; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 27; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 23; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 23; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-43.
Workers’ compensation coverage.

The commissioner shall purchase workers’ compensation insurance with coverage for all personnel employed by the department as authorized by law, and all personnel shall be entitled to the benefits prescribed by the operation of law, Sections 71-3-1 through 71-3-111, as the same is now or may hereafter be amended, cited as the “Workers’ Compensation Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7962.5; Laws, 1971, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 28; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 24; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 24; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 24, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-45.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 67]

§ 47-5-47.
Nepotism prohibited; employees not to be interested in contracts.

It shall be unlawful for any person related by affinity or consanguinity within the third degree computed according to the rules of the civil law to the Governor, Lieutenant Governor or commissioner to accept any employment in the state correctional system, neither shall the commissioner or other officer or employee of the state correctional system be directly or indirectly interested in any contract, purchase or sale for or in behalf of or on account of the state correctional system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7952; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 32; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 7; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 29; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 25; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 25; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 25; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-49.
Employees not to engage in other business.

Neither the commissioner nor any other employee, save physicians and chaplains not employed for all their time, shall have or engage in any other business during his normal hours of employment that may require his personal attention or time. The Governor, in the case of the commissioner, and the commissioner in the case of any other employee shall receive prior notification and approve outside employment and the respective parties named herein shall punish a violation of this provision by the dismissal of the employee if the offense justifies such dismissal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7953; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 33; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 8; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 30; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 26; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 26; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 26; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-51.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, § 7954; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 34; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 31; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 27]

§ 47-5-53.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 37]

§ 47-5-54.
Status of employees as peace officers; promulgation and enforcement of speed limits upon grounds of correctional facilities.

Employees assigned to the canine unit of the department may, upon request, assist law enforcement agencies by using specially trained dogs in any matter relating to the tracking, discovery or capture of any person in the enforcement of criminal statutes pertaining to the possession, sale or use of narcotics or other dangerous drugs, or in the pursuit of suspected felons and, while so doing, shall have the status of peace officers anywhere in the state and shall have the status of law enforcement officers and peace officers as contemplated by Sections 45-6-3, 97-3-7 and 97-3-19.

Employees of the department while performing their officially assigned duties relating to the custody, control, transportation, recapture or arrest of any offender within the jurisdiction of the department or any offender of any jail, penitentiary, public workhouse or overnight lockup of the state or any political subdivision thereof not within the jurisdiction of the department, shall have the status of peace officers anywhere in the state in any matter relating to the custody, control, transportation or recapture of such offender, and shall have the status of law enforcement officers and peace officers as contemplated by Sections 45-6-3, 97-3-7 and 97-3-19.

The commissioner may appoint investigators with the Corrections Investigation Division who have been certified by the Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training and who shall be empowered to investigate and enforce all applicable regulations of the department, which are related to the functions and missions of the department, and all laws of the State of Mississippi and who shall be empowered to investigate and enforce all laws of the State of Mississippi in private correctional facilities and regional county correctional facilities. These employees shall have the status of law enforcement officers and peace officers as contemplated by Sections 45-6-3, 97-3-7 and 97-3-19.

These officers shall be under the supervision of the commissioner. These officers may perform any service of process required to be performed at any facility owned by the Department of Corrections, at any private correctional facility or at any regional county correctional facility.

The commissioner may promulgate rules regulating the speed of motor vehicles on roads within the grounds of any correctional facility and such restrictions may be enforced by employees of the department by citation or as otherwise prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 18; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 28; Laws, 1983, ch. 345; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch 471, § 27; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 27; Laws, 1986, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 333, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 422, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 454, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2006.).

§ 47-5-55.
Exemption from jury service.

The officers and employees of the state correctional system are exempt from jury service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7974; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 54; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 32; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 29; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 28; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 28, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-56.
Lease of property; operating funds; disposal of income; transfer of property.

The department shall lease to the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks for a period of twenty (20) years all timberlands in Quitman County for an annual rental of One Dollar ($1.00). The lands so leased to the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall be used and maintained as a public game and fish management area. Proceeds from the sale of the timber or from any forest management practice shall be deposited into the Lambert State Forest Revolving Fund created in Section 47-5-78. All costs associated with the management of timber shall be paid from the fund. The remaining funds shall then be deposited in the Prison Agricultural Enterprises Fund, as created in Section 47-5-66. Any timber needed in the building operations carried on by the department may be purchased by the department at a cost not to exceed the cost of the management of that timber. Upon the transfer of the real property described in Section 1 of Chapter 517, Laws of 2001, to the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the department and the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may terminate or modify as appropriate any lease entered into under this section regarding such property.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 18; Laws, 1978, ch. 301, § 3; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 30; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 421, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 29; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 29; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 15; Laws, 1992, ch. 506, § 11; Laws, 1996, ch. 337, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 517, § 2, eff from and after Mar. 30, 2001.

§ 47-5-57.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2001, ch. 517, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 30, 2001).

[Laws, 1997, ch. 412, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1997).]

§ 47-5-58.
Sales by commissary to persons or agencies.

The commissary located at any facility of the correctional system shall not sell to any person or agency, any food or other commodities, whether produced by the correctional system or not, for any amount less than the wholesale price of such food or other commodities in the area of the facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 380, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 34; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 32; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 30; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 30, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-59.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1984, ch. 398, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Codes, 1942, § 7970; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 50; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 12; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 35; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 33]

§ 47-5-60.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1992, ch. 506, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 15, 1992).

[Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 20; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 36; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 34; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 31; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 220; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 31]

§ 47-5-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 38; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 13]

§ 47-5-62.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1984, ch. 420, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 22; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 37; Laws, 1978, ch. 301, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 35]

§ 47-5-63.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 51; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 14]

§ 47-5-64.
Agricultural leases of prison lands to private entities; reservation of additional land for agricultural or nonagricultural projects of Department of Corrections; lease of prison land for power generation or other commercial or industrial projects.

The commissioner is hereby directed to determine the number of acres and location of land under the department’s jurisdiction that are needed for security purposes, for Prison Agricultural Enterprises and for nonagricultural purposes. The commissioner shall designate and reserve such additional land for agricultural or nonagricultural enterprise projects of the department, as he deems necessary. The commissioner shall then recommend to the Department of Finance and Administration the number of acres of department land that should be leased to private entities and the term of the leases.

The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to lease for agricultural purposes that Penitentiary land so recommended for not less than three (3) nor more than eight (8) years, with the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board.

The Department of Finance and Administration, with the approval of the Governor, the Secretary of State and the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections, is authorized to lease Penitentiary land for power generation projects or other commercial or industrial projects at the same time that it leases the land as prescribed in subsection (2) of this section. The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to negotiate all aspects of leases or related agreements executed under this subsection consistent with the following:

The period of the lease term combined with the term of renewal shall not exceed forty (40) years.

Any lease or renewal lease shall:

Provide for periodic rent adjustments throughout the term of the lease; and

Require the lessee to provide a decommissioning and restoration bond or other security securing the lessee’s obligation to remove all aboveground and underground facilities to a depth of at least three (3) feet underground and to restore the surface to a condition similar to its condition before the commencement of the lease.

Any lease or renewal lease may provide for any combination of the following: base rent, bonuses, percentage of income payments, royalty payments or other terms and conditions that the Department of Finance and Administration deems necessary to maintain a fair and equitable return to the state and to protect the leased land throughout the term of the lease or renewal lease.

Oil, gas and mineral rights in the leased land shall be reserved to the State of Mississippi.

This subsection does not authorize the sale or transfer of title to any state lands.

The Department of Finance and Administration may charge fees and expenses, not to exceed costs, incurred in administering this subsection.

Any monies derived from leasing lands under this subsection shall be deposited to the Prison Agricultural Enterprise Fund as provided in Section 47-5-66.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 301, § 1; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 36; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 32; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 221; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 32; Laws, 1986, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 16; Laws, 1992, ch. 506, § 12; Laws, 2007, ch. 351, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 538, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 47-5-65.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 52; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 15]

§ 47-5-66.
Agricultural leases of prison lands to private entities; procedures; methods of payment of rents; disposal of income; fee per acre in lieu of ad valorem taxes.

Except as provided in Section 47-5-64(3), it shall be the duty of the Department of Finance and Administration, with the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, to lease lands at public contract upon the submission of two (2) or more sealed bids to the Department of Finance and Administration after having advertised the land for rent in newspapers of general circulation published in Jackson, Mississippi; Memphis, Tennessee; the county in which the land is located; and contiguous counties for a period of not less than two (2) successive weeks. The first publication shall be made not less than ten (10) days before the date of the public contract, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days before that date. The Department of Finance and Administration may reject any and all bids. If all bids on a tract or parcel of land are rejected, the Department of Finance and Administration may then advertise for new bids on that tract or parcel of land. Successful bidders shall take possession of their leaseholds at the time authorized by the Department of Finance and Administration. However, rent shall be due no later than the day upon which the lessee shall assume possession of the leasehold, and shall be due on the anniversary date for each following year of the lease. The Department of Finance and Administration may provide in any lease that rent shall be paid in full in advance or paid in installments, as may be necessary or appropriate. In addition, the Department of Finance and Administration may accept, and the lease may provide for, assignments of federal, state or other agricultural support payments, growing crops or the proceeds from the sale thereof, promissory notes, or any other good and valuable consideration offered by any lessee to meet the rent requirements of the lease. If a promissory note is offered by a lessee, it shall be secured by a first lien on the crop of the lessee, or the proceeds from the sale thereof. The lien shall be filed pursuant to Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code and Section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, as enacted or amended. If the note is not paid at maturity, it shall bear interest at the rate provided for judgments and decrees in Section 75-17-7 from its maturity date until the note is paid. The note shall provide for the payment of all costs of collection and reasonable attorney’s fees if default is made in the payment of the note. The payment of rent by promissory note or any means other than cash in advance shall be subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, which shall place the approval of record in the minutes of the board.

There is created a special fund to be designated as the “Prison Agricultural Enterprises Fund” and to be used for the purpose of conducting, operating and managing the agricultural and nonagricultural enterprises of the department. Any monies derived from the leasing of Penitentiary lands, from the sales of timber as provided in Section 47-5-56, from the prison’s agricultural enterprises or earmarked for the Prison Industries Fund shall be deposited to the special fund. However, fifteen percent (15%) of the monies derived from the leasing of Penitentiary lands under Section 47-5-64(3) shall be deposited to a special fund to be distributed annually on a student pro rata basis to the public schools located in Sunflower County by the Department of Finance and Administration.

All profits derived from prison industries shall be placed in a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the “Prison Industries Fund,” to be appropriated each year by the Legislature to the nonprofit corporation, which is required to be organized under the provisions of Section 47-5-535, for the purpose of operating and managing the prison industries.

The state shall have the rights and remedies for the security and collection of the rents given by law to landlords.

Lands leased for agricultural purposes under Section 47-5-64(2) shall be subject to a fee-in-lieu of ad valorem taxes, including taxes levied for school purposes. The fee-in-lieu shall be Nine Dollars ($9.00) per acre. Upon the execution of the agricultural leases to private entities as authorized by Section 47-5-64(2), the Department of Finance and Administration shall collect the in lieu fee and shall forward the fees to the tax collector in which the land is located. The tax collector shall disburse the fees to the appropriate county or municipal governing authority on a pro rata basis. The sum apportioned to a school district shall not be less than the school district’s pro rata share based upon the proportion that the millage imposed for the school district by the appropriate levying authority bears to the millage imposed by the levying authority for all other county or municipal purposes. Any funds obtained by the corporation as a result of sale of goods and services manufactured and provided by it shall be accounted for separate and apart from any funds received by the corporation through appropriation from the State Legislature. All nonappropriated funds generated by the corporation shall not be subject to appropriation by the State Legislature.

Any land leased, as provided under Section 47-5-64(2), shall not be leased for an amount less than would be received if such land were to be leased under any federal loan program. In addition, all leases shall be subject to the final approval of the Public Procurement Review Board before such leases are to become effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1978, ch. 301, § 2; brought forward, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 37; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 33; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 222; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 33; Laws, 1987, ch. 463; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 17; Laws, 1989, ch. 308, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 534, § 24; Laws, 1992, ch. 506, § 13; Laws, 1994, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 388, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1997, ch. 367, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 362, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 363, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 334, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 483, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2006, ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 576, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 538, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 47-5-67.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1968, ch. 379; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 16]

§ 47-5-69.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1984, ch. 395, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

[Codes, 1942, § 7986; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 66; Laws, 1974, ch. 539, § 17; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 38; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 38]

§ 47-5-70.
“Board” and “lessee” defined.

As used in this chapter, “board” shall include the Mississippi Board of Corrections or its successor, and “lessee” shall mean the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 538, § 19; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 39; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 39; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 34; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1986).

§ 47-5-71.
Construction or pavement of roads.

The State Highway Commission and the Mississippi Department of Corrections are hereby authorized to enter into and perform agreements to contract together for the construction or the pavement of roads by the State Highway Department in and adjoining to any facility of the correctional system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7966; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 46; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 40; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 40; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 35; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 35; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1988).

§ 47-5-72.
Establishment of regional recycling centers at regional correctional facilities; participation of inmates in recycling center work program.

The Department of Corrections, counties and municipalities are authorized to develop regional recycling centers at regional correctional facilities.The department may establish a work program for inmates to participate in the recycling program. Inmates that are ineligible to participate in joint state-county programs and public service programs are also ineligible to participate in the program established for regional recycling centers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 318, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 47-5-73.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1976, ch. 440, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

[Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 69]

§ 47-5-75.
Suits by or against board of corrections; tort liability insurance.

The department is authorized to bring and maintain suits for the collection and enforcement of all demands and debts owing to the correctional system. No bond for costs, appeal bond, supersedeas bond or other security shall at any time be required of the department in any civil suit of any kind brought by or against it or its employees in their official capacity, except such suits as may be brought against it or them by the State of Mississippi. The Attorney General of the State of Mississippi is hereby directed to assist the department in the filing and prosecution of any suits filed herein.

The department shall have the further power and authority, in its discretion, to take adequate liability insurance on the operation of said correctional system, including liability insurance to protect the commissioner and other regular employees of the correctional system from tort actions in any state or federal court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7929; Laws, 1964, ch. 378, § 9; Laws, 1971, ch. 524, § 13; Laws, 1976, ch. 440, § 41; reenacted, Laws, 1981, ch. 465, § 41; reenacted, Laws, 1984, ch. 471, § 36; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1984, ch. 495, § 21; Laws, 1985, ch. 474, § 51; reenacted, Laws, 1986, ch. 413, § 36; Laws, 1986, ch. 438, § 32; Laws, 1987, ch. 483, § 33; Laws, 1988, ch. 442, § 30; Laws, 1988, ch. 504, § 19; Laws, 1989, ch. 537, § 29; Laws, 1990, ch. 518, § 30; Laws, 1991, ch. 618, § 29; Laws, 1992, ch. 491, § 31, approved May 12, 1992, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 47-5-76.
Payment of court costs for inmate’s civil action against Department employee pertaining to condition of confinement.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if an inmate plaintiff files a pauper’s affidavit in a civil action and the defendant is an employee of the department and the civil action pertains to the inmate’s condition of confinement, the department shall pay, out of any funds available for such purpose, all costs of court assessed against the inmate in the civil action. However, the department shall not pay the costs of court if the inmate has on three (3) or more prior occasions, while incarcerated, brought an action or appeal that was dismissed on the grounds that it was frivolous, malicious, or failed to state a claim upon which relief could be granted.

An inmate shall not bring a civil action or appeal a judgment in a civil action or proceeding in forma pauperis if the prisoner has, on three (3) or more prior occasions, while incarcerated or detained in any facility, brought an action or appeal in a court that was dismissed on the grounds that it was frivolous, malicious, or failed to state a claim upon which relief may be granted, unless the prisoner is under imminent danger of serious physical injury.

An inmate who proceeds in forma pauperis in a civil action shall pay twenty percent (20%) per month of the funds in his or her inmate account to the Department of Corrections until all filing fees and costs of his or her litigation are paid to the department. The department may withdraw such funds automatically from the account of any inmate permitted a civil filing as a pauper. If an inmate is allowed an appeal in forma pauperis of a civil action, the inmate shall reimburse all costs and fees to the department by automatic withdrawal each month in the amount of twenty percent (20%) of his or her funds until all state funds are reimbursed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 378, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 402, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 395, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 387, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2005.).